Missouri, session 2026, HB1724.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 301.020, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 301.020, to read as follows:
301.020. 1. Every owner of a motor vehicle or trailer, which shall be operated or
driven upon the highways of this state, except as herein otherwise expressly provided, shall
annually file, by mail or otherwise, in the office of the director of revenue, an application for
registration on a blank to be furnished by the director of revenue for that purpose containing:
(1) A brief description of the motor vehicle or trailer to be registered, including the
name of the manufacturer, the vehicle identification number, the amount of motive power of
the motor vehicle, stated in figures of horsepower and whether the motor vehicle is to be
registered as a motor vehicle primarily for business use as defined in section 301.010;
(2) The name, the applicant's identification number and address of the owner of such
motor vehicle or trailer;
(3) The gross weight of the vehicle and the desired load in pounds if the vehicle is a
commercial motor vehicle or trailer.
2. If the vehicle is a motor vehicle primarily for business use as defined in section
301.010 and if such vehicle is ten years of age or less and has less than one hundred fifty
thousand miles on the odometer, the director of revenue shall retain the odometer information
provided in the vehicle inspection report, and provide for prompt access to such information,
together with the vehicle identification number for the motor vehicle to which such
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1724 2
information pertains, for a period of ten years after the receipt of such information. This
section shall not apply unless:
(1) The application for the vehicle's certificate of ownership was submitted after July
1, 1989; and
(2) The certificate was issued pursuant to a manufacturer's statement of origin.
3. If the vehicle is any motor vehicle other than a motor vehicle primarily for business
use, a recreational motor vehicle, motorcycle, motortricycle, autocycle, bus, or any
commercial motor vehicle licensed for over twelve thousand pounds and if such motor
vehicle is ten years of age or less and has less than one hundred fifty thousand miles on the
odometer, the director of revenue shall retain the odometer information provided in the
vehicle inspection report, and provide for prompt access to such information, together with
the vehicle identification number for the motor vehicle to which such information pertains,
for a period of ten years after the receipt of such information. This subsection shall not apply
unless:
(1) The application for the vehicle's certificate of ownership was submitted after July
1, 1990; and
(2) The certificate was issued pursuant to a manufacturer's statement of origin.
4. If the vehicle qualifies as a reconstructed motor vehicle, motor change vehicle,
specially constructed motor vehicle, non-USA-std motor vehicle, as defined in section
301.010, or prior salvage as referenced in section 301.573, the owner or lienholder shall
surrender the certificate of ownership. The owner shall make an application for a new
certificate of ownership, pay the required title fee, and obtain the vehicle examination
certificate required pursuant to subsection 9 of section 301.190. If an insurance company
pays a claim on a salvage vehicle as defined in section 301.010 and the owner retains the
vehicle[,] as prior salvage, or if an insurance company retains a salvage vehicle as defined
in section 301.010 and subsequently transfers the vehicle to a buyer as prior salvage, the
vehicle shall only be required to meet the examination requirements under subsection 10 of
section 301.190. Notarized bills of sale along with a copy of the front and back of the
certificate of ownership for all major component parts installed on the vehicle and invoices
for all essential parts which are not defined as major component parts shall accompany the
application for a new certificate of ownership. If the vehicle is a specially constructed motor
vehicle, as defined in section 301.010, two pictures of the vehicle shall be submitted with the
application. If the vehicle is a kit vehicle, the applicant shall submit the invoice and the
manufacturer's statement of origin on the kit. If the vehicle requires the issuance of a special
number by the director of revenue or a replacement vehicle identification number, the
applicant shall submit the required application and application fee. All applications required
under this subsection shall be submitted with any applicable taxes which may be due on the

HB 1724 3
purchase of the vehicle or parts. The director of revenue shall appropriately designate
"Reconstructed Motor Vehicle", "Motor Change Vehicle", "Non-USA-Std Motor Vehicle", or
"Specially Constructed Motor Vehicle" on the current and all subsequent issues of the
certificate of ownership of such vehicle.
5. Every insurance company that pays a claim for repair of a motor vehicle which as
the result of such repairs becomes a reconstructed motor vehicle as defined in section 301.010
or that pays a claim on a salvage vehicle as defined in section 301.010 and the owner is
retaining the vehicle shall in writing notify the owner of the vehicle, and in a first party claim,
the lienholder if a lien is in effect, that he is required to surrender the certificate of ownership,
and the documents and fees required pursuant to subsection 4 of this section to obtain a prior
salvage motor vehicle certificate of ownership or documents and fees as otherwise required
by law to obtain a salvage certificate of ownership, from the director of revenue. The
insurance company shall within thirty days of the payment of such claims report to the
director of revenue the name and address of such owner, the year, make, model, vehicle
identification number, and license plate number of the vehicle, and the date of loss and
payment.
6. Anyone who fails to comply with the requirements of this section shall be guilty of
a class B misdemeanor.
7. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to promote a
blindness education, screening and treatment program. The director of revenue shall collect
the donations and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the blindness
education, screening and treatment program fund established in section 209.015. Moneys in
the blindness education, screening and treatment program fund shall be used solely for the
purposes established in section 209.015; except that the department of revenue shall retain no
more than one percent for its administrative costs. The donation prescribed in this subsection
is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for registration at the time of issuance or
renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at the time the applicant presents the
completed application to the director whether the applicant is interested in making the one
dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
8. An applicant for registration may make a donation of an amount not less than one
dollar to promote an organ donor program. The director of revenue shall collect the donations
and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the organ donor program
fund as established in sections 194.297 to 194.304. Moneys in the organ donor fund shall be
used solely for the purposes established in sections 194.297 to 194.304, except that the
department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its administrative costs. The
donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for
registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at

HB 1724 4
the time the applicant presents the completed application to the director whether the applicant
is interested in making a contribution not less than one dollar as prescribed in this subsection.
9. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to the Missouri
medal of honor recipients fund. The director of revenue shall collect the donations and
deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the Missouri medal of honor
recipients fund as established in section 226.925. Moneys in the medal of honor recipients
fund shall be used solely for the purposes established in section 226.925, except that the
department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its administrative costs. The
100 donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for
101 registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at
102 the time the applicant presents the completed application to the director whether the applicant
103 is interested in making the one dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
✔